Rhode Island, session 2025, SB470.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 27-20.9-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 27-20.9 entitled "Contract
with Healthcare Providers" is hereby amended to read as follows:
27-20.9-3. Pay-for-performance guidelines.
A health insurer shall not require a physician, as a condition of contracting, to participate
in any financial or reimbursement incentive program, commonly referred to as pay-for-
performance programs, unless such program meets the principles and guidelines for pay-for-
performance programs endorsed by the national quality forum and adopted by the AQA Alliance
or the hospital quality alliance, or similar principles and guidelines for pay-for-performance
programs approved by the office of the health insurance commissioner "capitation," or any other
"alternative payment model" that creates a financial incentive for a physician to limit medically
necessary care or to choose to keep low need patients or not to keep high need patients.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001563
========